Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6156.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 282. (1) For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2026 through December 31, 2030, a taxpayer who serves as a preceptor for an advanced practice nursing program-required clinical rotation at an approved health care site located in this state may claim a credit against the tax imposed by this part in an amount equal to $500.00 for every 250 hours completed during the tax year as a preceptor for an advanced practice nursing program-required clinical rotation not to exceed $1,500.00 per tax year. To claim the credit under this section, the taxpayer shall submit a certified written statement that the taxpayer did not receive payment during the tax year from any source for serving as a preceptor and supporting documentation in a form and manner as prescribed by the department to verify the taxpayer's hours of participation as a preceptor with the annual tax return filed under this part on which a credit under this section is claimed. (2) If the amount of the credit allowed under this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year must be refunded. (3) By July 1, 2027 and each July 1 thereafter through 2031, the department shall submit to each member of the legislature, the governor, the clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and the senate and house fiscal agencies an annual report concerning the operation and effectiveness of the credit allowed under this section. The report shall include all of the following: (a) A brief assessment of the overall effectiveness of the tax credit created under this section. (b) The number of taxpayers submitting a claim for a credit with an annual return under this section for the immediately preceding calendar year. (c) The total amount of credits claimed and allowed under this section for the immediately preceding calendar year. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Advanced practice nursing program-required clinical rotation" means a clinical rotation required by an institution of higher education that is established for a student who is enrolled in an accredited advanced practice nursing program and requires the student to complete a minimum number of hours of instruction in a clinical setting under the guidance of an advanced practice registered nurse at a health care site approved by the institution of higher education. (b) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means that term as defined in section 17201 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17201, and includes a registered professional nurse who holds a specialty certification as a nurse anesthetist under section 17210 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17210. (c) "Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher education described in section 4, 5, or 6 of article VIII of the state constitution of 1963 or an independent nonprofit degree-granting institution of postsecondary education located in this state that is approved by the state board of education. (d) "Preceptor" means an advanced practice registered nurse who provides supervision and instruction during student clinical rotation training experiences.